Wyoming, session 2026, HB0156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-1-401 and 16-1-402 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 4
LOCAL WATER SYSTEM FUNDING

HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
16-1-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Board" means the state loan and investment
board and includes the office of state lands and
investments;

(ii) "Program" means the local water system
funding program created by this article.

16-1-402. Local water system funding program;
creation; requirements; duties.

(a) The local water system funding program is created
to provide financial assistance to cities, towns and
special districts for improvements to community public
water systems and community wastewater systems in
accordance with this article.

(b) The state loan and investment board, with
assistance from the office of state lands and investments,
HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
shall administer the program. The board shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement the program.

(c) The board shall:

(i) Establish an application process by which
cities, towns and special districts may apply for financial
assistance under the program;

(ii) Receive and review applications for
financial assistance under the program, in accordance with
subsection (f) of this section;

(iii) Administer the financial assistance
available under the program, including processing and
receiving repayments;

(iv) Conduct an annual audit of the program;

(v) Report to the joint appropriations committee
and the joint minerals, business and economic development
interim committee not later than November 1 of each year on
HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
the financial assistance provided under the program for the
immediately preceding fiscal year.

(d) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, funds
under the program shall be available only to cities, towns
and special districts for financial assistance for eligible
projects for the following purposes:

(i) Predevelopment and preapplication costs;

(ii) Planning and technical assistance;

(iii) Local matching funds;

(iv) Repayment of federal or state loans
received from other programs or funds;

(v) Costs related to joining a regional water
system or regional wastewater system.

(e) Projects shall be eligible for financial
assistance from the program only if the project is for a
water system or wastewater system for which consumer rates
HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
are charged in accordance with W.S. 15-7-407 and if the
project meets at least one (1) of the following:

(i) The project is an eligible project for
funding under the state water pollution control revolving
loan account, subject to the requirements of W.S. 16-1-201
through 16-1-207;

(ii) The project is an eligible project for
funding under the state drinking water revolving loan
account, subject to the requirements of W.S. 16-1-301
through 16-1-308;

(iii) The project is under the Wyoming water
development office and is approved by the legislature;

(iv) The project is an eligible local government
capital construction project under W.S. 9-4-604(a).

(f) Upon receiving an application for financial
assistance under the program, the board shall review the
application to determine whether the application qualifies
for the program in accordance with this article. Financial
HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
assistance under the program shall be approved by majority
vote of the state loan and investment board. In reviewing
applications for the program, the board shall consider, at
a minimum, the following factors:

(i) The population of the city, town or special
district that has applied for financial assistance;

(ii) The ability of the city, town or special
district to pay for or repay funds for the project for
which financial assistance is sought under the program;

(iii) The level of existing consumer rates
charged by the city, town or special district, including
whether the rates charged are in accordance with W.S.
15-7-407, and the amount of funding reserves that the city,
town or special district has, in comparison to other
cities, towns and special districts;

(iv) The ability of the city, town or special
district to join a regional water system or regional
wastewater system;

HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
(v) The results and record of the city, town or
county based on the annual audit required under W.S.
9-1-507.

(g) A city, town or special district that receives
financial assistance under the program shall establish or,
if already established, maintain funds for depreciation in
accordance with W.S. 15-7-407(b).

(h) Funding for the program shall be from funds
borrowed under subsection (j) of this section and from any
other funds received by the board for the program.

(j) The board is authorized to borrow an amount not
to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) in any one
(1) fiscal year to provide financial assistance under the
program. The board shall borrow funds under this subsection
from the strategic investments and projects account,
provided that if there are not sufficient unexpended,
unobligated funds within the strategic investments and
projects account in the applicable fiscal year, the board
may borrow funds under this subsection from the legislative
stabilization reserve account subject to the limits
HB0156

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0385
specified in this subsection. In no event shall the board
borrow more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) for
the program in any one (1) fiscal year. The amounts
borrowed under this subsection shall be repaid to the
account from which the funds were borrowed. Interest on any
unpaid loan balance shall be charged and shall be equal to
the total rate of return earned on the fund from which the
funds were borrowed during the previous fiscal year,
provided that the interest rate shall be not less than zero
percent (0%) and not more than one and five‑tenths percent
(1.5%).

Section 2. The state loan and investment board shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0156